Wisconsin, session 2025, SB289.
do enact as follows:SB289,1Section 1. 227.137 (3) (b) (intro.) and 1. of the statutes are consolidated, renumbered 227.137 (3) (b) and amended to read:227.137 (3) (b) An analysis and detailed quantification of the economic impact of the proposed rule, prepared in accordance with sub. (3m), including the implementation and compliance costs that are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along to the businesses, local governmental units, and individuals that may be affected by the proposed rule, specifically including all of the following: 1. An estimate of the total implementation and compliance costs that are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along to businesses, local governmental units, and individuals as a result of the proposed rule, expressed as well as any cost savings that are reasonably expected to be realized by those businesses, local governmental units, and individuals. The agency shall list out the costs and cost savings as they pertain to each affected type of business, local governmental unit, and individual. The agency shall also compile the total net costs and cost savings for all affected businesses, local governmental units, and individuals and shall express the result as a single dollar figure. With respect to an independent economic impact analysis prepared under sub. (4m) or s. 227.19 (5) (b) 3., the person preparing the analysis shall provide a detailed explanation of any variance from the agency’s estimate under this subdivision paragraph.SB289,1mSection 1m. 227.137 (3) (b) 2. of the statutes is repealed.SB289,2Section 2. 227.137 (3) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:227.137 (3) (c) An analysis of the actual and quantifiable benefits of the proposed rule not otherwise described under par. (b), including an assessment of how effective the proposed rule will be in addressing the policy problem that the rule is intended to address.SB289,3Section 3. 227.137 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:227.137 (3m) For purposes of sub. (3) (b), the estimate of the implementation and compliance costs that are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along to the businesses, local governmental units, and individuals that may be affected by the proposed rule, as well as any cost savings that are reasonably expected to be realized by those businesses, local governmental units, and individuals, shall be attributed to the proposed rule regardless of the level or extent of discretion afforded to the agency in determining the policies of the proposed rule and regardless of whether those costs and cost savings are attributable to any of the following:(a) The underlying statutory directives or objectives that are the basis for the proposed rule or that determine or otherwise impact the policies proposed to be included in the rule.(b) Any other statutory directives or objectives that impact the proposed rule or that determine or otherwise impact the policies proposed to be included in the rule.(c) Requirements, limitations, or other constraints imposed under federal law.(d) Other factors that bear on the necessity of the policies of the proposed rule.SB289,4Section 4. 227.137 (4m) (b) 2. a. of the statutes is amended to read:227.137 (4m) (b) 2. a. If the estimate in the independent economic impact analysis of total implementation and compliance costs under sub. (3) (b) 1. varies from the agency’s estimate by 15 percent or more or varies from the agency’s determination that there will be no implementation or compliance costs, the cochairperson shall assess the agency that is proposing the proposed rule for the costs of completing the independent economic impact analysis.SB289,5Section 5. 227.137 (4m) (b) 2. b. of the statutes is amended to read:227.137 (4m) (b) 2. b. If the estimate in the independent economic impact analysis of total implementation and compliance costs under sub. (3) (b) 1. does not vary from the agency’s estimate by 15 percent or more or is in accord with the agency’s determination that there will be no implementation and compliance costs, the costs of completing the independent economic impact analysis shall be paid from the appropriation account that corresponds to his or her house of the legislature under s. 20.765 (1) (a) or (b).SB289,6Section 6. 227.137 (4m) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:227.137 (4m) (c) 1. Include in the analysis the information that is required under sub. (3), prepared in accordance with sub. (3m).SB289,7Section 7. 227.139 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:227.139 (1) If an economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (2), a revised economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4), or an independent economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4m) or 227.19 (5) (b) 3. indicates that $10,000,000 or more in there are any net implementation and compliance costs that are are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along to businesses, local governmental units, and individuals over any 2-year period as a result of the proposed rule, the agency proposing the rule shall stop work on the proposed rule and may not continue promulgating the proposed rule notwithstanding any provision authorizing or requiring the agency to promulgate the proposed rule, except as authorized under sub. (2).SB289,8Section 8. 227.139 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:227.139 (2) (b) If an agency is prohibited from promulgating a rule under sub. (1), the agency may modify the proposed rule, if the modification is germane to the subject matter of the proposed rule, to address the implementation and compliance costs of the proposed rule. If the agency modifies a proposed rule under this paragraph, the agency shall prepare a revised economic impact analysis under s. 227.137 (4). Following the modification, the agency may continue with the rule-making process as provided in this subchapter if the revised economic impact analysis prepared by the agency indicates, and any independent economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4m) or 227.19 (5) (b) 3. subsequent to the agency’s modification also indicates, that $10,000,000 or more in no net implementation and compliance costs are not reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along to businesses, local governmental units, and individuals over any 2-year period as a result of the proposed rule.SB289,9Section 9. 227.139 (2) (c) of the statutes is created to read:227.139 (2) (c) If an agency is prohibited from promulgating a rule under sub. (1), the agency may promulgate a separate rule or use a previously promulgated rule to fully offset the implementation and compliance costs of the proposed rule, if the other rule is promulgated in the same calendar year as the proposed rule and has not previously been used to offset costs under this paragraph. If the agency promulgates or uses a rule as provided under this paragraph, the agency shall prepare a revised economic impact analysis under s. 227.137 (4). The agency may continue with the rule-making process as provided in this subchapter if the revised economic impact analysis prepared by the agency indicates, and any independent economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4m) or 227.19 (5) (b) 3. subsequent to the agency’s modification also indicates, that another rule promulgated by the agency fully offsets any implementation and compliance costs that are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along to businesses, local governmental units, and individuals over any 2-year period as a result of the proposed rule.SB289,10Section 10. 227.19 (5) (b) 3. a. of the statutes is amended to read:227.19 (5) (b) 3. a. If the estimate in the independent economic impact analysis of total implementation and compliance costs under s. 227.137 (3) (b) 1. varies from the agency’s estimate by 15 percent or more or varies from the agency’s determination that there will be no implementation or compliance costs, the committee shall assess the agency that is proposing the proposed rule for the costs of completing the independent economic impact analysis.SB289,11Section 11. 227.19 (5) (b) 3. b. of the statutes is amended to read:227.19 (5) (b) 3. b. If the estimate in the independent economic impact analysis of total implementation and compliance costs under s. 227.137 (3) (b) 1. does not vary from the agency’s estimate by 15 percent or more or is in accord with the agency’s determination that there will be no implementation and compliance costs, the costs of completing the independent economic impact analysis shall be paid in equal parts from the appropriation accounts under s. 20.765 (1) (a) and (b).SB289,12Section 12. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to a proposed rule whose statement of scope is presented for approval under s. 227.135 (2) on the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb289 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb289 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB289 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB289 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB289: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting